Massachusetts, session 194th, S2165.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 30B of the General Laws is amended by striking out 
paragraphs (a) and (b) and inserting in place thereof the following two sections:- 
(a) Except as permitted pursuant to this section and section 7, for the procurement of a 
supply or service in the amount of $10,000 or greater, but not more than $100,000, a 
procurement officer shall seek written quotations from no fewer than 3 persons customarily 
providing the supply or service. The procurement officer shall record: (1) the names and 
addresses of all persons from whom quotations were sought, (2) the purchase description used 
for the procurement, (3) the names of the persons submitting quotations and (4) the date and 
amount of each quotation. Such information shall be retained in the file required pursuant to 

of 2 10 section 3. A governmental body may require that any procurement in an amount of not more than 
$100,000 be subject to the provisions of section 5 or section 6. 
(b) The procurement officer shall award the contract to the responsible person offering 
the needed quality of supply or service at the lowest quotation unless the procurement officer 
elected to procure the supply or service subject to section 6. If the supply or service was procured 
subject to section 6, the procurement officer shall award the contract pursuant to section 6 
subsection (g). 
SECTION 2. Section 5 of said Chapter 30B, is hereby amended by striking out the figure 
“$50,000”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $100,000.  
SECTION 3. Section 6 of said Chapter 30B is hereby amended in paragraph (a) by 
inserting after the word “$100,000” the following words: “except as permitted pursuant to 
section 4 subsection (a),” 
SECTION 4. Section 6A of said chapter 30B, is hereby amended by striking out the 
figure “$50,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $100,000  
SECTION 5. Section 7 of said chapter 30B, is hereby amended by striking out the figure 
“$50,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $100,000